Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1,125
False documents; violation; penalty.

(1) Any person who offers as evidence of ownership for any livestock sold, traded, or otherwise disposed of as provided in the Livestock Brand Act or section 54-415, any forged, altered, or otherwise falsely prepared document or form, knowing the same to be forged, altered, or otherwise falsely prepared, is guilty of the Class IV felony of criminal possession of a forged instrument as defined in section 28-604.

(2) Any person who forges, alters, or otherwise changes in any manner any of the forms or documents which are satisfactory evidence of ownership or any other form or document required by or provided for in the Livestock Brand Act or section 54-415, is guilty of second degree forgery as defined in section 28-603, and shall be punished in accordance with such section.

(3) Any person who knowingly misrepresents or misuses any certificate of inspection or other satisfactory evidence of ownership is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 56.